North Dakota, session 69, HB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 53-06.1-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
53-06.1-01.1. Gaming commission - Rules - Authority .
1. The state gaming commission shall administer and control games of chance . The
commission consists of the:
a. The lieutenant governor, who shall serve as chairman and four other;
b. Six members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate.,
including one member who:
(1) Is an owner of an alcoholic beverage establishment ;
(2) Represents a licensed organization with adjusted gross proceeds not
exceeding fifty thousand dollars;
(3) Represents a licensed organization with adjusted gross proceeds of fifty
thousand dollars or more;
(4) Represents a licensed organization operating in a rural community with a
population of fewer than ten thousand;
(5) Represents the governing body of a city with a population of forty thousand
or more; and
Page No. 1 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(6) Represents the governing body of a city with a population of fewer than forty
thousand or the county where the city is located; and
c. Two members, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
one appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.
2. The appointed members serve three-year two - year terms and until a successor is
appointed and qualified. If the senate is not in session when the term of a member
expires, the governor may make an interim appointment, and the interim appointee
holds office until the senate confirms or rejects the appointment. A member appointed
to fill a vacancy arising from other than the natural expiration of a term serves only for
the unexpired portion of the term. The terms of the commissioners must be staggered
so no more than two terms expire each July first.
2.3. A person is ineligible for appointment tomember of the commission if that person has
not been:
a. Must be a resident of this state for at least two years before the date of
appointment. A person is also ineligible if that person is not
b. Must be of such character and reputation as to promote public confidence in the
administration of gaming in this state. A person is also ineligible if that person has
c. May not have been convicted of a felony criminal offense or has pled guilty or
been found guilty of any violation of chapter 12.1-06, 12.1-08, 12.1-09, 12.1-10,
12.1-11, 12.1-12, 12.1-22, 12.1-23, 12.1-24, 12.1-28, 53-06.1, or 53-06.2, or has
pled guilty or been found guilty of any violation of section 6-08-16 or 6-08-16.2, or
has pled guilty or been found guilty of any offense or violation that has a direct
bearing on the person'sindividual's fitness to be involved in gaming, or who has
committed an equivalent offense or violation of the laws of another state or of the
United States. A person who has a financial interest in gaming or is an employee
or a member of the gaming committee of a licensed organization or distributor
cannot be a member of the commission. For the purpose of this subsection, a
financial interest includes the receiving of any direct payment from an eligible
organization for property, services, or facilities provided to that organization.
3.4. Commission members are entitled to seventy-five dollarsthe amount under
subsection 1 of section 54 - 03 - 20 per day for compensation for each day spent on
Page No. 2 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
commission duties and mileage and expense reimbursement as allowed to other state
employees.
4.5. The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32, to administer and
regulate the gaming industry, including methods of conduct, play, and promotion of
games; minimum procedures and standards for recordkeeping and internal control;
requiring tax returns and reports from organizations or distributors; methods of
competition and doing business by distributors and manufacturers; acquisition and use
of gaming equipment; quality standards or specifications for the manufacture of pull
tabs, paper bingo cards, electronic pull tab devices, pull tab dispensing devices, bingo
card marking devices, and fifty-fifty raffle systems; to ensure that net proceeds are
used for educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal, religious, or public-spirited uses; to
protect and promote the public interest; to ensure fair and honest games; to ensure
that fees and taxes are paid; and to prevent and detect unlawful gambling activity.
6. Based on evidence obtained from the attorney general or a complaint under chapter
28 - 32, the commission shall hold a hearing according to the requirements under
chapter 28 - 32. A hearing must be recorded on video and broadcast live. Upon
disposition of an adjudicative proceeding, the commission may:
a. Require a representative of a licensed organization or distributor to participate in
training or for good cause prohibit the person from being involved in gaming as
an employee or volunteer. The commission may for good cause prohibit a person
from providing personal or business services to an organization or distributor.
b. Prohibit a person from playing games if the person violates this chapter, chapter
12.1 - 28 or 53 - 06.2, or a gaming rule .
c. Require or authorize an organization to pay or prohibit an organization from
paying a bingo, electronic quick shot bingo, or raffle prize to a player on a dispute
or based on a factual determination or a hearing by the commission .
d. Based on reasonable ground or written complaint, suspend, deny, or revoke an
organization's permit or an organization's, distributor's, or manufacturer's
application or license for violation, by the organization, distributor, or
manufacturer or any officer, director, agent, member, or employee of the
organization, distributor, or manufacturer, of this chapter or any gaming rule.
Page No. 3 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
e. Impose a monetary fine on a licensed organization, organization that has a
permit, distributor , manufacturer, owner of an authorized site, or third-party
business operating gaming and working as an agent of the charity for failure to
comply with this chapter or any gaming rule. This fine may be in addition to or in
lieu of a license suspension or revocation. The monetary fine for each violation
by:
(1) An organization is a minimum of twenty - five dollars and may not exceed two
percent of the organization's average quarterly gross proceeds, or five
thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(2) A distributor is a minimum of one hundred dollars and may not exceed five
thousand dollars.
(3) A manufacturer is a minimum of five hundred dollars and may not exceed
two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(4) An owner of an authorized site is a minimum of two hundred fifty dollars and
may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.
f. At any time within three years after any amount of fees, monetary fine, interest,
penalty, or tax required to be paid pursuant to this chapter becomes due, bring a
civil action to collect the amount due. However, if for any reason there is a
change in adjusted gross proceeds or tax liability by an amount which is in
excess of twenty - five percent of the amount of adjusted gross proceeds or tax
liability originally reported on the tax return, any additional tax determined to be
due may be assessed within six years after the due date of the tax return, or
six years after the tax return was filed, whichever period expires later. An action
may be brought although the person owing the fees or tax is not presently
licensed.
g. Institute an action in any district court for declaratory or injunctive relief against a
person, whether or not the person has a gaming licensee, as the commission
deems necessary to prevent noncompliance with this chapter or gaming rules.
h. For good cause, require a licensed organization to use the attorney general's
recordkeeping system for all games.
Page No. 4 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
7. The commission may refer to the attorney general for prosecution any evidence the
commission believes is evidence of a crime.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 53-06.1-15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
53-06.1-15.1. Authority of the attorney general - Duties.
1. The attorney general may:
1.a. Inspect all sites in which gaming is conducted or inspect all premises where
gaming equipment is manufactured or distributed. The attorney general may
require a licensed manufacturer to reimburse the attorney general for the
reasonable actual cost of transportation, lodging, meals, and incidental expenses
incurred in inspecting the manufacturer's facility.
2.b. Inspect all gaming equipment and supplies.
3.c. Seize, remove, or impound any gaming equipment, supplies, games, or books
and records for the purpose of examination and inspection.
4.d. Demand access to and inspect, examine, photocopy, and audit all books and
records of applicants, organizations, lessors, manufacturers, distributors, and
affiliated companies concerning any income, expense, or use of net proceeds,
and determine compliance with this chapter or gaming rules.
5.e. Permit the commissioner or proper representative of the internal revenue service
of the United States to inspect a tax return or furnish a copy of the tax return, or
information concerning any item contained in the return, or disclosed by any audit
or investigation report of the gaming activity of any organization or player, or
recordkeeping information. However, information cannot be disclosed to the
extent that the attorney general determines that the disclosure would identify a
confidential informant or seriously impair any civil or criminal investigation.
Except when directed by judicial order, or for pursuing civil or criminal charges
regarding a violation of this chapter or a gaming rule, or as is provided by law, the
attorney general may not divulge nor make known, to any person, any income or
expense item contained in any tax return or disclosed by an audit or investigative
report of any taxpayer provided to the attorney general by the internal revenue
service.
Page No. 5 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The attorney general shall refer any evidence of a violation of law or rule to the gaming
commission for review, unless this chapter provides the attorney general authority
regarding the violation, including a violation related to tax - related delinquency, permits ,
licensure, and site authorization. A decision made by the attorney general under this
chapter may be appealed to the gaming commission.
6. Require a representative of a licensed organization or distributor to participate in
training or for good cause prohibit the person from being involved in gaming as an
employee or volunteer. The attorney general may for good cause prohibit a person
from providing personal or business services to an organization or distributor.
7. Prohibit a person from playing games if the person violates this chapter, chapter
12.1-28 or 53-06.2, or a gaming rule.
8. Require or authorize an organization to pay or prohibit an organization from paying a
bingo, electronic quick shot bingo, or raffle prize to a player on a dispute or based on a
factual determination or a hearing by the attorney general.
9. Based on reasonable ground or written complaint, suspend, deny, or revoke an
organization's permit or an organization's, distributor's, or manufacturer's application
or license for violation, by the organization, distributor, or manufacturer or any officer,
director, agent, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer,
of this chapter or any gaming rule.
10. Impose a monetary fine on a licensed organization, organization that has a permit,
distributor, manufacturer, or third-party business operating gaming and working as an
agent of the charity for failure to comply with this chapter or any gaming rule. The
monetary fine for each violation by an organization is a minimum of twenty-five dollars
and may not exceed two percent of the organization's average quarterly gross
proceeds, or five thousand dollars, whichever is greater. The monetary fine for each
violation by a distributor is a minimum of one hundred dollars and may not exceed five
thousand dollars. The monetary fine for each violation by a manufacturer is a minimum
of five hundred dollars and may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars. This
fine may be in addition to or in place of a license suspension or revocation.
11. At any time within three years after any amount of fees, monetary fine, interest,
penalty, or tax required to be paid pursuant to this chapter becomes due, bring a civil
Page No. 6 25.0798.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
action to collect the amount due. However, if for any reason there is a change in
adjusted gross proceeds or tax liability by an amount which is in excess of twenty-five
percent of the amount of adjusted gross proceeds or tax liability originally reported on
the tax return, any additional tax determined to be due may be assessed within six
years after the due date of the tax return, or six years after the tax return was filed,
whichever period expires later. An action may be brought although the person owing
the fees or tax is not presently licensed.
12. Institute an action in any district court for declaratory or injunctive relief against a
person, whether or not the person is a gaming licensee, as the attorney general
deems necessary to prevent noncompliance with this chapter or gaming rules.
13. For good cause, require a licensed organization to use the attorney general's
recordkeeping system for any or all games.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL - GAMING
COMMISSION - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $25,000, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, to the office of attorney general for the purpose of defraying the
costs of operations of the gaming commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.
Page No. 7 25.0798.03000